Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.551

Director's authority—Adoption of rules.

(1) The director may adopt rules, make specific decisions, orders, and rulings, including demands and findings, and take other necessary action for the implementation and enforcement of this subchapter after consultation with the board and receiving the board's recommendations. In the administration of this subchapter the department shall not enter any controversy arising over work assignments with respect to the trades involved in the construction industry.

(2) Compliance with the rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section is prima facie evidence of compliance with the subchapter. Copies of all rules shall be maintained by the department and made available upon request.

[ 2000 c 238 s 219.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.